District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

29A-101.94

Liquidation proceedings — Discontinuance.

Repealed.

June 8, 1954, 68 Stat. 218, ch. 269, § 94
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(j), 58 DCR 1720
2001 Ed., § 29-101.94.
1981 Ed., § 29-394.
1973 Ed., § 29-931f.